Illinois, session 104th, HB4994.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Energy Efficient Building Act is amended by 5changing Section 55 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3125/55)7    Sec. 55. Illinois Stretch Energy Code.8    (a) The Board, in consultation with the Agency, shall 9create and adopt the Illinois Stretch Energy Code, to allow 10municipalities, counties, and projects authorized or funded by 11the Board to achieve more energy efficiency in buildings than 12the Illinois Energy Conservation Code through a consistent 13pathway across the State. The Illinois Stretch Energy Code 14shall be available for adoption by any municipality or county 15and shall set minimum energy efficiency requirements, taking 16the place of the Illinois Energy Conservation Code within any 17municipality or county that adopts the Illinois Stretch Energy 18Code.19    (b) The Illinois Stretch Energy Code shall have separate 20components for commercial and residential buildings, which may 21be adopted by the municipality or county jointly or 22separately.23    (c) The Illinois Stretch Energy Code shall apply to all   HB4994- 2 -LRB104 19663 HLH 33112 b1projects to which an energy conservation code is applicable 2that are authorized or funded in any part by the Board after 3July 1, 2024.4    (d) Development of the Illinois Stretch Energy Code shall 5be completed and available for adoption by municipalities or 6counties by June 30, 2024.7    (e) Consistent with the requirements under paragraph (2.5) 8of subsection (g) of Section 8-103B of the Public Utilities 9Act and under paragraph (2) of subsection (j) of Section 8-104 10of the Public Utilities Act, municipalities and counties may 11adopt the Illinois Stretch Energy Code and may use utility 12programs to support compliance with the Illinois Stretch 13Energy Code. The amount of savings from such utility efforts 14that may be counted toward achievement of their annual savings 15goals shall be based on reasonable estimates of the increase 16in savings resulting from the utility efforts, relative to 17reasonable approximations of what would have occurred absent 18the utility involvement.19    (f) The Illinois Stretch Energy Code's residential 20components shall:21        (1) apply to residential buildings as defined under 22    Section 10;23        (2) set performance targets using a site energy index 24    with reductions relative to the 2006 International Energy 25    Conservation Code; and26        (3) include stretch energy codes with site energy   HB4994- 3 -LRB104 19663 HLH 33112 b1    index standards and adoption dates as follows: by no later 2    than June 30, 2024, the Board shall create and adopt a 3    stretch energy code with a site energy index no greater 4    than 0.50 of the 2006 International Energy Conservation 5    Code; by no later than December 31, 2026, the Board shall 6    create and adopt a stretch energy code with a site energy 7    index no greater than 0.40 of the 2006 International 8    Energy Conservation Code, unless the Board identifies 9    unanticipated burdens associated with the stretch energy 10    code adopted in 2023 or 2024, in which case the Board may 11    adopt a stretch energy code with a site energy index no 12    greater than 0.42 of the 2006 International Energy 13    Conservation Code, provided that the more relaxed standard 14    has a site energy index that is at least 0.05 more 15    restrictive than the 2024 International Energy 16    Conservation Code; by no later than December 31, 2029, the 17    Board shall create and adopt a stretch energy code with a 18    site energy index no greater than 0.33 of the 2006 19    International Energy Conservation Code, unless the Board 20    identifies unanticipated burdens associated with the 21    stretch energy code adopted in 2025, in which case the 22    Board may adopt a stretch energy code with a site energy 23    index no greater than 0.35 of the 2006 International 24    Energy Conservation Code, but only if that more relaxed 25    standard has a site energy index that is at least 0.05 more 26    restrictive than the 2027 International Energy   HB4994- 4 -LRB104 19663 HLH 33112 b1    Conservation Code; and by no later than December 31, 2032, 2    the Board shall create and adopt a stretch energy code 3    with a site energy index no greater than 0.25 of the 2006 4    International Energy Conservation Code.5    (g) The Illinois Stretch Energy Code's commercial 6components shall:7        (1) apply to commercial buildings as defined under 8    Section 10;9        (2) set performance targets using a site energy index 10    with reductions relative to the 2006 International Energy 11    Conservation Code; and12        (3) include stretch energy codes with site energy 13    index standards and adoption dates as follows: by no later 14    than June 30, 2024, the Board shall create and adopt a 15    stretch energy code with a site energy index no greater 16    than 0.60 of the 2006 International Energy Conservation 17    Code; by no later than December 31, 2026, the Board shall 18    create and adopt a stretch energy code with a site energy 19    index no greater than 0.50 of the 2006 International 20    Energy Conservation Code; by no later than December 31, 21    2029, the Board shall create and adopt a stretch energy 22    code with a site energy index no greater than 0.44 of the 23    2006 International Energy Conservation Code; and by no 24    later than December 31, 2032, the Board shall create and 25    adopt a stretch energy code with a site energy index no 26    greater than 0.39 of the 2006 International Energy   HB4994- 5 -LRB104 19663 HLH 33112 b1    Conservation Code.2    (h) The process for the creation of the Illinois Stretch 3Energy Code includes:4        (1) within 60 days after the effective date of this 5    amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the Capital 6    Development Board shall meet with the Illinois Energy Code 7    Advisory Council to advise and provide technical 8    assistance and recommendations to the Capital Development 9    Board for the Illinois Stretch Energy Code, which shall:10            (A) advise the Capital Development Board on 11        creation of interim performance targets, code 12        requirements, and an implementation plan for the 13        Illinois Stretch Energy Code;14            (B) recommend amendments to proposed rules issued 15        by the Capital Development Board;16            (C) recommend complementary programs or policies;17            (D) complete recommendations and development for 18        the Illinois Stretch Energy Code elements and 19        requirements by December 31, 2023;20        (2) As part of its deliberations, the Illinois Energy 21    Code Advisory Council shall actively solicit input from 22    other energy code stakeholders and interested parties.23(Source: P.A. 103-4, eff. 5-31-23; 104-315, eff. 1-1-26.)